Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-206 Additional funds required, new
insurers. In addition to the paid-up capital stock or unimpaired surplus
as required under section 431:3-205 and section 431:3-208, the following
insurers shall possess when first authorized:

(1) In the case of domestic stock or reciprocal
insurers not existing and authorized in this State on July 1, 1988, or domestic
mutual insurers not existing and authorized in this State on July 1, 1988,
which qualify upon the basis of possession of surplus in lieu of applications
and premiums collected as provided in section 431:4-303 to section 431:4-307,
bona fide additional surplus equaling in amount not less than fifty per cent of
the capital stock or surplus otherwise required for the class or classes of
insurance proposed to be transacted; or

(2) In the case of foreign and alien insurers which
have been insurers for less than five years except if as a result of a
reorganization (including a merger, corporate acquisition, or formation of a
subsidiary), bona fide additional surplus in an amount not less than fifty per
cent of the capital stock or surplus otherwise required for the class or
classes of insurance which the insurer is authorized to transact in its
domicile. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1989, c 207, §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next